dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
SFX A   ecer  èce         ecer
SFX A   ecer  ècent       ecer
SFX A   ecer  ècera       ecer
SFX A   ecer  ècerai      ecer
SFX A   ecer  èceraient   ecer
SFX A   ecer  ècerais     ecer
SFX A   ecer  ècerait     ecer
SFX A   ecer  èceras      ecer
SFX A   ecer  ècerez      ecer
SFX A   ecer  èceriez     ecer
SFX A   ecer  ècerions    ecer
SFX A   ecer  ècerons     ecer
SFX A   ecer  èceront     ecer
SFX A   ecer  èces        ecer
SFX A   emer  ème         emer
SFX A   emer  èment       emer
SFX A   emer  èmera       emer
SFX A   emer  èmerai      emer
SFX A   emer  èmeraient   emer
SFX A   emer  èmerais     emer
SFX A   emer  èmerait     emer
SFX A   emer  èmeras      emer
SFX A   emer  èmerez      emer
SFX A   emer  èmeriez     emer
SFX A   emer  èmerions    emer
SFX A   emer  èmerons     emer
SFX A   emer  èmeront     emer
SFX A   emer  èmes        emer
SFX A   ener  ène         ener
SFX A   ener  ènent       ener
SFX A   ener  ènera       ener
SFX A   ener  ènerai      ener
SFX A   ener  èneraient   ener
SFX A   ener  ènerais     ener
SFX A   ener  ènerait     ener
SFX A   ener  èneras      ener
SFX A   ener  ènerez      ener
SFX A   ener  èneriez     ener
SFX A   ener  ènerions    ener
SFX A   ener  ènerons     ener
SFX A   ener  èneront     ener
SFX A   ener  ènes        ener
SFX A   eper  èpe         eper
SFX A   eper  èpent       eper
SFX A   eper  èpera       eper
SFX A   eper  èperai      eper
SFX A   eper  èperaient   eper
SFX A   eper  èperais     eper
SFX A   eper  èperait     eper
SFX A   eper  èperas      eper
SFX A   eper  èperez      eper
SFX A   eper  èperiez     eper
SFX A   eper  èperions    eper
SFX A   eper  èperons     eper
SFX A   eper  èperont     eper
SFX A   eper  èpes        eper
SFX A   erer  ère         erer
SFX A   erer  èrent       erer
SFX A   erer  èrera       erer
SFX A   erer  èrerai      erer
SFX A   erer  èreraient   erer
SFX A   erer  èrerais     erer
SFX A   erer  èrerait     erer
SFX A   erer  èreras      erer
SFX A   erer  èrerez      erer
SFX A   erer  èreriez     erer
SFX A   erer  èrerions    erer
SFX A   erer  èrerons     erer
SFX A   erer  èreront     erer
SFX A   erer  ères        erer
SFX A   eser  èse         eser
SFX A   eser  èsent       eser
SFX A   eser  èsera       eser
SFX A   eser  èserai      eser
SFX A   eser  èseraient   eser
SFX A   eser  èserais     eser
SFX A   eser  èserait     eser
SFX A   eser  èseras      eser
SFX A   eser  èserez      eser
SFX A   eser  èseriez     eser
SFX A   eser  èserions    eser
SFX A   eser  èserons     eser
SFX A   eser  èseront     eser
SFX A   eser  èses        eser
SFX A   ever  ève         ever
SFX A   ever  èvent       ever
SFX A   ever  èvera       ever
SFX A   ever  èverai      ever
SFX A   ever  èveraient   ever
SFX A   ever  èverais     ever
SFX A   ever  èverait     ever
SFX A   ever  èveras      ever
SFX A   ever  èverez      ever
SFX A   ever  èveriez     ever
SFX A   ever  èverions    ever
SFX A   ever  èverons     ever
SFX A   ever  èveront     ever
SFX A   ever  èves        ever
SFX A   evrer èvre        evrer
SFX A   evrer èvrent      evrer
SFX A   evrer èvrera      evrer
SFX A   evrer èvrerai     evrer
SFX A   evrer èvreraient  evrer
SFX A   evrer èvrerais    evrer
SFX A   evrer èvrerait    evrer
SFX A   evrer èvreras     evrer
SFX A   evrer èvrerez     evrer
SFX A   evrer èvreriez    evrer
SFX A   evrer èvrerions   evrer
SFX A   evrer èvrerons    evrer
SFX A   evrer èvreront    evrer
SFX A   evrer èvres       evrer
SFX A   er    era         é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    erai        é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    eraient     é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    erais       é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    erait       é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    eras        é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    erez        é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    eriez       é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    erions      é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    erons       é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   er    eront       é[cdlmnprsty]er
SFX A   ébrer èbre        ébrer
SFX A   ébrer èbrent      ébrer
SFX A   ébrer èbres       ébrer
SFX A   écer  èce         écer
SFX A   écer  ècent       écer
SFX A   écer  èces        écer
SFX A   écher èche        écher
SFX A   écher èchent      écher
SFX A   écher èches       écher
SFX A   écrer ècre        écrer
SFX A   écrer ècrent      écrer
SFX A   écrer ècres       écrer
SFX A   éder  ède         éder
SFX A   éder  èdent       éder
SFX A   éder  èdes        éder
SFX A   égler ègle        égler
SFX A   égler èglent      égler
SFX A   égler ègles       égler
SFX A   égner ègne        égner
SFX A   égner ègnent      égner
SFX A   égner ègnes       égner
SFX A   égrer ègre        égrer
SFX A   égrer ègrent      égrer
SFX A   égrer ègres       égrer
SFX A   éguer ègue        éguer
SFX A   éguer èguent      éguer
SFX A   éguer ègues       éguer
SFX A   éler  èle         éler
SFX A   éler  èlent       éler
SFX A   éler  èles        éler
SFX A   émer  ème         émer
SFX A   émer  èment       émer
SFX A   émer  èmes        émer
SFX A   éner  ène         éner
SFX A   éner  ènent       éner
SFX A   éner  ènes        éner
SFX A   éper  èpe         éper
SFX A   éper  èpent       éper
SFX A   éper  èpes        éper
SFX A   équer èque        équer
SFX A   équer èquent      équer
SFX A   équer èques       équer
SFX A   érer  ère         érer
SFX A   érer  èrent       érer
SFX A   érer  ères        érer
SFX A   éser  èse         éser
SFX A   éser  èsent       éser
SFX A   éser  èses        éser
SFX A   éter  ète         éter
SFX A   éter  ètent       éter
SFX A   éter  ètes        éter
SFX A   étrer ètre        étrer
SFX A   étrer ètrent      étrer
SFX A   étrer ètres       étrer
SFX A   évrer èvre        évrer
SFX A   évrer èvrent      évrer
SFX A   évrer èvres       évrer
SFX A   éyer  èye         éyer
SFX A   éyer  èyent       éyer
SFX A   éyer  èyes        éyer

SFX C Y 52
SFX C   er    a           e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ai          e[lt]er
SFX C   er    aient       e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ais         e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ait         e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ant         e[lt]er
SFX C   er    as          e[lt]er
SFX C   er    asse        e[lt]er
SFX C   er    assent      e[lt]er
SFX C   er    asses       e[lt]er
SFX C   er    assiez      e[lt]er
SFX C   er    assions     e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ez          e[lt]er
SFX C   er    iez         e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ions        e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ons         e[lt]er
SFX C   er    âmes        e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ât          e[lt]er
SFX C   er    âtes        e[lt]er
SFX C   er    èrent       e[lt]er
SFX C   er    é           e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ée          e[lt]er
SFX C   er    ées         e[lt]er
SFX C   er    és          e[lt]er
SFX C   eler  èle         eler
SFX C   eler  èlent       eler
SFX C   eler  èlera       eler
SFX C   eler  èlerai      eler
SFX C   eler  èleraient   eler
SFX C   eler  èlerais     eler
SFX C   eler  èlerait     eler
SFX C   eler  èleras      eler
SFX C   eler  èlerez      eler
SFX C   eler  èleriez     eler
SFX C   eler  èlerions    eler
SFX C   eler  èlerons     eler
SFX C   eler  èleront     eler
SFX C   eler  èles        eler
SFX C   eter  ète         eter
SFX C   eter  ètent       eter
SFX C   eter  ètera       eter
SFX C   eter  èterai      eter
SFX C   eter  èteraient   eter
SFX C   eter  èterais     eter
SFX C   eter  èterait     eter
SFX C   eter  èteras      eter
SFX C   eter  èterez      eter
SFX C   eter  èteriez     eter
SFX C   eter  èterions    eter
SFX C   eter  èterons     eter
SFX C   eter  èteront     eter
SFX C   eter  ètes        eter
