dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
abjurer/ANT
abouter/ANT
abriter/A
abîmer/A
accepter/A
accoler/A
accoster/A
accoupler/A
acculturer/ANT
acharner/A
acheter/C
acérer/A
adjurer/A
adorer/A
affaisser/A
affilier/A
agacer/A
aggraver/A
aider/A
aimer/A
aligner/A
allumer/A
amarrer/A
ameuter/A
amplifier/A
analyser/A
annexer/A
anticiper/A
apparier/A
approprier/A
apurer/A
archiver/A
arranger/AR
arroser/A
assigner/AR
assommer/A
attaquer/A
attiser/A
atténuer/A
authentifier/A
avaliser/A
aviver/A
avérer/A
bagarrer/A
balbutier/A
ballotter/A
barder/AD
baver/A
blaguer/A
bloquer/AD
borner/A
bouder/A
bousculer/A
brancher/AD
bredouiller/A
brocher/AD
brouiller/AD
budgétiser/AD
bâillonner/AD
bégueter/C
bétonner/A
cacheter/ADR
calculer/AR
calomnier/A
camoufler/A
caper/AD
captiver/A
carbonater/AD
carreler/ADR
casser/A
causer/ADR
celer/CDR
censurer/A
certifier/A
charcuter/A
chauffer/A
chercher/AR
chiffrer/AD
chuter/AR
cingler/A
ciseler/C
civiliser/A
classer/ADR
cliqueter/AD
coaliser/A
coffrer/AD
collationner/A
coller/ADR
colorier/A
commanditer/A
communiquer/A
comporter/A
comptabiliser/A
concerter/AD
condamner/AR
confier/A
conformer/A
congeler/CD
congestionner/AD
conjurer/A
conserver/A
consommer/A
consulter/A
contourner/A
contre-indiquer/A
contrecarrer/A
convoiter/A
copier/AR
corseter/C
cotiser/A
coupler/AD
cramponner/A
crisper/AD
croiser/AD
créditer/AD
créner/A
crêper/AD
culbuter/A
cuver/AD
damner/A
desserrer/A
dicter/A
dilapider/A
discipliner/A
discuter/AR
dissimuler/A
distancer/A
diversifier/A
dompter/A
dorloter/A
déblayer/A
décider/A
décupler/A
défausser/A
défiler/A
défroisser/A
dégeler/C
déglacer/A
dégrafer/A
déguster/A
déjucher/A
délayer/A
déloger/A
démanteler/C
démarquer/A
déminer/A
démoraliser/A
démériter/A
dénier/A
dénoyauter/A
départager/A
déphosphorer/A
déplomber/A
déporter/A
déprécier/A
déraisonner/A
dérouler/A
désapprouver/A
désengorger/A
désinfecter/A
déstocker/A
détecter/A
détraquer/A
dévaloriser/A
dévisager/A
effaroucher/A
embarrasser/A
emmêler/A
emporter/A
encaisser/A
encasteler/C
encrer/A
enfiler/A
engraisser/A
enrager/A
ensemencer/AR
entre-tuer/A
envenimer/A
espacer/A
exalter/A
exhiber/A
exporter/AR
extirper/A
faciliter/A
façonner/AR
ficher/A
fileter/C
flatter/A
forger/A
fracturer/A
froisser/AD
fureter/C
fustiger/A
ganter/AD
gazonner/ADR
geler/CDR
glisser/A
gouverner/A
greffer/AR
griser/AD
habiliter/AR
haleter/C
haranguer/A
homologuer/A
humer/A
illusionner/A
immobiliser/A
improviser/A
incommoder/A
indisposer/A
infuser/A
inoculer/A
insulter/A
interpeller/A
intérioriser/A
isoler/A
juger/AD
l'appliquer/A
l'éborgner/A
l'écacher/A
l'écheniller/A
l'écrabouiller/A
l'égaler/A
l'élider/A
l'émorfiler/A
l'épeurer/A
l'équerrer/A
l'étarquer/A
l'étuver/A
lainer/AD
layer/ADR
ligaturer/A
lisser/AD
lustrer/AD
m'éborgner/A
m'ébrouer/A
m'écheniller/A
m'écrabouiller/A
m'éfaufiler/A
m'électrocuter/A
m'émeriser/A
m'épanner/A
m'épontiller/A
m'étamer/A
m'étriquer/A
m'éviter/A
manigancer/A
marier/ADR
marteler/C
materner/A
mentionner/A
minuter/A
modeler/CR
moduler/AD
morceler/A
murmurer/A
méjuger/A
n'utiliser/A
n'ébourrer/A
n'échardonner/A
n'écoper/A
n'éculer/A
n'égrapper/A
n'éliminer/A
n'émorfiler/A
n'éperonner/A
n'équerrer/A
n'étançonner/A
n'étronçonner/A
nager/A
neutraliser/A
notifier/A
objecter/A
offenser/A
ordonner/AR
pacifier/A
parader/A
paresser/A
passionner/AD
peiner/A
peler/C
perpétuer/A
peupler/ADR
pincer/AR
planifier/A
plumer/AD
polémiquer/A
posséder/AD
pressurer/A
procurer/A
propager/A
précautionner/A
préméditer/A
prétexter/A
quadrupler/A
raccommoder/A
radiodiffuser/A
rallonger/A
rapprocher/A
rattacher/A
reboucher/A
relancer/A
remédier/A
rengorger/A
reporter/AS
ressusciter/A
retapisser/A
retracer/A
retuber/A
revoter/A
rober/AD
ruser/A
récolter/A
réfuter/A
rénover/A
réserver/A
réutiliser/A
rééduquer/A
s'écailler/A
s'éroder/A
salarier/A
savonner/A
scruter/A
signer/AD
solidariser/AD
souffler/A
sous-traiter/A
stigmatiser/A
subjuguer/A
suggestionner/A
supprimer/A
surgeler/C
surpayer/A
t'ébarber/A
t'ébouter/A
t'échardonner/A
t'écoper/A
t'écumer/A
t'égueuler/A
t'élucubrer/A
t'énamourer/A
t'épisser/A
t'érotiser/A
t'étoupiller/A
t'éventer/A
tapisser/AR
terrasser/A
tisser/AR
tortiller/AD
traiter/AR
transplanter/A
tresser/A
truffer/A
téléguider/A
vacciner/AR
verbaliser/A
vilipender/A
voiler/AD
ébarber/ANT
ébouter/ANT
écarquiller/A
écarteler/C
échauffer/A
économiser/A
écrabouiller/ANT
écœurer/ANT
égarer/A
éjointer/ANT
élucider/A
émerveiller/A
énoncer/A
épeler/A
épointer/ANT
éprouver/A
éreinter/A
étancher/A
étirer/A
étriquer/ANT
évangéliser/ANT
ôter/A
